Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,150
Nail technology school; license; application; requirements.

Along with the application, an applicant for a license to operate a nail technology school shall submit:

(1) A detailed floor plan or blueprint of the proposed school building sufficient to show compliance with the relevant rules and regulations;

(2) Evidence of minimal property damage, personal injury, and liability insurance coverage for the proposed school;

(3) A copy of the curriculum to be taught for all courses;

(4) A copy of the school catalog, handbook, or policies and the student contract; and

(5) A list of the names and credentials of all persons licensed under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act to be employed by the school.

A nail technology school's license shall be valid only for the location named in the application. When a school desires to change locations, it shall comply with section 38-10,158.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 70;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 95;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,221;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 412;

Laws 2018, LB731, § 53.